New Jersey, session 222, A544.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary, a person who is designated as an organ donor on the persons examination permit, special learners permit, motorcycle-only examination permit, commercial learners permit, motorized bicycle license, basic drivers license, probationary drivers license, commercial driver license, or identification card, pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1978, c.181 (C.39:3-12.2), shall remain designated as an organ donor upon the renewal of such permit, license, or identification card, and upon the subsequent issuance of a license or identification card to the person, unless the person removes the designation.  The Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall provide the opportunity to remove the designation upon renewal of a permit, license, or identification card and upon the subsequent issuance of a license or identification card to the person. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month after enactment, but the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission may take such administrative action in advance of the effective date as may be necessary.